Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.310

Administration and rule-making powers.

The director has the authority and administrative discretion to administer and interpret this chapter to fulfill the intent of the legislature as expressed in RCW 19.230.005. In accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the director may issue rules under this chapter that are clearly required to govern the activities of licensees and other persons subject to this chapter.

[ 2013 c 106 s 8; 2003 c 287 s 33.]